Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB357.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1102-C.3 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 1102-C.3. Excluded Transactions.--The tax imposed by section 1102-C shall not be imposed upon:* * *(26) A transfer of real estate from the surviving spouse or minor child of an individual covered under the act of June 24, 123456789101112131415161718192021 1976 (P.L.424, No.101), referred to as the Emergency and Law Enforcement Personnel Death Benefits Act, if the following apply:(i) The covered individual died as a result of the performance of duties as a covered individual.(ii) One of the following:(A) The real estate was the principal residence of the surviving spouse or minor child and also the principal residence of the covered individual.(B) In the case of a surviving spouse, the real estate was the principal residence of the covered individual, but not the surviving spouse, and the covered individual and surviving spouse married within one year prior to the death of the covered individual.(C) In the case of a minor child, the real estate was the principal residence of the covered individual regardless of the minor child's residence at the time of the death of the covered individual.(iii) T he transfer occurs within five years of the covered individual's death.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0357PN0311 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021